Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-14] Acquisition of real property.
(a) The legislature declares it to be necessary for the public health and
welfare that water and water related resources be conserved and protected. The
acquisition of real property for this objective shall constitute a public
purpose for which public funds may be expended.

(b) The commission may acquire real property
and easements by purchase, gift, devise, lease, eminent domain, or otherwise
for flood control, water management, or water and water-related resource
conservation.

(c) Land, water areas, and related resources
which may be acquired for this purpose include, but are not limited to, streams
and other watercourses, parks and recreation areas, beaches, submerged lands,
and other open areas, as well as necessary access sites and rights-of-way.

(d) This section does not limit the exercise
of similar powers delegated by statute to any state or local government
agency. This section is not intended to limit, in any way, the powers of the
commission in regards to the acquisition of real property under any other
statute. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next